Maryland, session 2026, SB0560.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Human Services
10–449.
(a) A continuing care agreement shall allow a subscriber to terminate the
agreement by giving a written termination notice to the provider.
(b) If a continuing care agreement is terminated by the subscriber’s election or
death within the first 90 days of occupancy, the provider shall pay any contractual entrance
fee refund within 30 days after the earlier to occur of:
(1) the recontracting of the subscriber’s unit by:
(i) another subscriber for whom an entrance fee has been paid; or
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0560*

SENATE BILL 560
(ii) another party who is not a subscriber; or
(2) the later to occur of:
(i) the 90th day after the date the written termination notice is
given or the date of death; or
(ii) the day the independent living units at the facility have operated
at 95% of capacity for the previous 6 months.
(c) If a continuing care agreement is terminated by the subscriber’s election or
death after the first 90 days of occupancy, the provider shall pay any contractual entrance
fee refund within 60 days after the subscriber’s death or the effective date of termination,
if on the date of death or at any time between the date the written termination notice is
given and the effective date of termination:
(1) the subscriber resides in a unit at a higher level of care than the level
of care in which the subscriber resided on initially entering the facility; and
(2) the last unit in which the subscriber resided at the initial level of care
on entering the facility has been occupied by or reserved for another subscriber who has
paid an entrance fee.
(d) This section does not prohibit a provider from requiring that a subscriber’s
unit be vacated before any contractual entrance fee refund is paid as a result of the
subscriber’s election to terminate a continuing care agreement.
(e) (1) If an entrance fee refund is conditioned on the reoccupying of a
subscriber’s unit and the unit has not been reoccupied within 9 months of the subscriber’s
death or the date of the contract termination, a provider shall submit a written report to
the subscriber or the subscriber’s beneficiary stating:
(i) that the unit has not been reoccupied; and
(ii) the efforts the provider has made to reoccupy the unit.
(2) After the provider submitted the report required under paragraph (1)
of this subsection, the provider shall submit an updated written report to the subscriber or
the subscriber’s beneficiary every 6 months until the subscriber’s unit has been reoccupied.
(F) (1) IF A CONTINUING CARE AGREEMENT IS TERMINATED:
(I) BY WRITTEN NOTICE GIVEN BY A SUBSCRIBER, THE
TERMINATION DATE OF THE CONTINUING CARE AGREEMENT SHALL BE ON THE DATE
ON WHICH THE SUBSCRIBER VACATED THE UNIT AND REMOVED ALL PERSONAL
PROPERTY OF THE SUBSCRIBER FROM THE UNIT; OR

SENATE BILL 560 3
(II) ON THE SUBSCRIBER’S DEATH, THE TERMINATION OF THE
CONTINUING CARE AGREEMENT SHALL BE EFFECTIVE ON THE DATE OF THE
SUBSCRIBER’S DEATH.
(2) REGARDLESS OF WHETHER AN ENTRANCE FEE REFUND IS
CONDITIONED ON THE REOCCUPYING OF A SUBSCRIBER’S UNIT, WHEN A
CONTINUING CARE AGREEMENT IS TERMINATED BY THE SUBSCRIBER’S ELECTION
OR DEATH, THE PROVIDER SHALL PAY ANY CONTRACTUAL ENTRANCE FEE REFUND
NOT LATER THAN 2 YEARS AFTER THE DATE THE CONTINUING CARE AGREEMENT IS
TERMINATED.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.